Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.120 is amended to read:
244.120. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when met with an actual or
potential conflict of interest, a public official shall:
(a) If the public official is  a member of the Legislative Assembly, announce publicly, pursuant
to rules of the house of which the public official is a member,  the nature of the conflict before
taking any action thereon in the capacity of a public official.
(b) If the  public official is a judge, remove the judge from the case giving rise to the conflict
or advise the parties of the nature of the conflict.
(c) If the public official  is any other appointed official subject to this chapter, notify in writing
the person who appointed the public official to office of the nature of the conflict, and  request that
the appointing authority dispose of the matter giving rise to  the conflict. Upon receipt of the re-
quest, the appointing  authority shall designate within a reasonable time an alternate to dispose of
the matter, or shall direct the official to dispose of the matter in  a manner specified by the ap-
pointing authority.
(2) An elected public official, other  than a member of the Legislative Assembly, or an appointed
public official serving on a board or commission, shall:
(a) When met with a potential  conflict of interest, announce publicly the nature of the potential
conflict prior to taking any action thereon in the capacity of a public official; or
(b) When met with an actual  conflict of interest, announce publicly the nature of the actual
conflict and:
(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, refrain from  participating
as a public official in any discussion or debate on the issue out  of which the actual conflict arises
or from voting on the issue.
(B) If any public official’s vote is necessary to meet a requirement of a minimum number of votes
to take official action, be eligible to vote, but  not to participate as a public official in any discussion
or debate on the issue out of which the actual conflict arises.
(C) If the official action is  the adoption of a local budget under ORS 294.305 to 294.565
that includes providing compensation or benefits  to the public official or a relative of the
public official, be eligible to participate in any discussion or debate on the budget and to vote.
(3) Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) of this section requires any public official to announce a
conflict of interest more than once on  the occasion which the matter out of which the conflict arises
is discussed or debated.
Enrolled Senate Bill 983 (SB 983-A) Page 1
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a public official  to vote if the official is otherwise pro-
hibited from doing so.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 983 (SB 983-A) Page 2